Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1153.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 807 of the act of June 29, 1953 (P.L.304, No.66), known as the Vital Statistics Law of 1953, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 807. Records: Fees for Copies.--* * *(g.1) No fee shall be charged for certified copies of birth records or parts thereof furnished to individuals sixty-five (65) years of age and older seeking a revised certified copy of a birth record for the purpose of obtaining a REAL ID under the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 act of May 26, 2017 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Pennsylvania REAL ID Compliance Act."* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1153PN1277 - 2 - 1234